Wisconsin, session 2025, AB293.
do enact as follows:AB293,13Section 1. 2023 Wisconsin Act 19, section 9427 (1) is amended to read:AB293,1,64[2023 Wisconsin Act 19] Section 9427 (1) Sunset of community-oriented 5policing-house grant program. The treatment of s. 165.989 and the repeal of s. 620.455 (2) (cp) take effect on July 1, 2025 2027.AB293,1,77